Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 3. Social Security

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Denial of social security benefits to adopted children who are neither natural children nor stepchildren of eligible individual and who do not meet dependency requirements, under § 202(d)(8) of the Social Security Act, as amended (42 USC § 402(d)(8)), 57 ALR Fed 942.

Use of medical-vocational guidelines (20 CFR Part 404, Subpart P, Appendix 2) in determining disability of social security benefits claimant,
60 ALR Fed 796.

Recoupment of excess payments of federal old-age, survivors', and disability insurance benefits as barred by § 204(b) of the Social Security Act (42 USC § 404(b)), 70 ALR Fed 427.

Waiver, under 42 USC § 416(k), of 9-month duration-of-relationship prerequisite to eligibility of widow, widower, or stepchild for social security survivor's benefits, 70 ALR Fed 781.

Determination and application of correct legal standard in weighing medical opinion of treating source in Social Security disability cases, 149 ALR Fed 1.

§ 9-3-301.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Employee” includes administrative and elective officers of a state or political subdivision thereof;

“Employment” means any service performed by any employee in the employ of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, for the employer except service which in the absence of an agreement entered into under this act would constitute “employment”, as defined in the Social Security Act or service which under the Social Security Act may not be included in an agreement between the state and the federal security administrator entered into under this act;

“Federal Insurance Contributions Act” means subchapter (A) of chapter 9 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as the code has been and may from time to time be amended;

“Federal security administrator” includes any individual to whom the federal security administrator has delegated any of his functions under the Social Security Act, with respect to coverage under such act of employees of states and their political subdivisions;

“Political subdivision” includes any instrumentality of the state, or one (1) or more of its political subdivisions, or of the state and one (1) or more of its political subdivisions, but only if the instrumentality is a juristic entity which is legally separate and distinct from the state or subdivision, and only if its employees are not, by virtue of their relation to the juristic entity, employees of the state or subdivision. “Political subdivision” includes school districts, the Wyoming Education Association, the Wyoming High School Athletic Association, and any other employer within the public school system of Wyoming;

“Social Security Act” means the act of congress approved August 14, 1935, chapter 531, 49 Stat. 620, officially cited as the “Social Security Act,” (including regulations and requirements issued pursuant thereto), as the act has been and may from time to time be amended;

“State agency” means the office of the state treasurer of the state of Wyoming;

“Wages” means all remuneration for employment including the cash value of all remuneration paid in any medium other than cash and does not include that part of the remuneration which, even if it were for “employment” within the meaning of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, would not constitute “wages” within the meaning of that act;

“This act” means W.S.

9-3-301

through

9-3-306

.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 122, § 2; 1953, ch. 43, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-284; W.S. 1977, §

9-5-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ix), substituted “9-3-306” for “9-3-307.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Federal Insurance Contributions Act. —

The federal Insurance Contributions Act, referred to in Subsection (a)(iii), was repealed by Act 1959, ch. 736, 68A Stat. 919. For similar provisions, see 26 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq.

Social Security Act. —

The federal Social Security Act, referred to in Subsection (a)(vi), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of evidence when evaluating mental impairment in social security disability case under 20 C.F.R. § 404.1520a, 166 ALR Fed 361.

§ 9-3-302.
Administration by secretary of Wyoming retirement system; payment of costs.

All administrative matters pertaining to this act shall be administered by the secretary of the Wyoming retirement system. The cost of such services shall be paid in the manner provided by law.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 206, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-285; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-5-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-3-301(a)(ix).

§ 9-3-303.
Agreements with federal security administrator to extend benefits to employees; provisions.

The state treasurer with the approval of the governor may enter on behalf of the state into an agreement with the federal security administrator or his successor, consistent with the terms and provisions of this act for the purpose of extending the benefits of the federal old age and survivors’ insurance system to employees of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, with respect to services which constitute employment. The agreement may contain provisions relating to coverage, benefits, contributions, effective date, modification and termination of the agreement, administration, and other appropriate provisions which the state treasurer and federal security administrator agree upon. Except as otherwise required by or under the Social Security Act as to the services to be covered, the agreement shall provide in effect that:

Benefits will be provided for employees, and their dependents and survivors, whose services are covered by the agreement on the same basis as though the services constituted employment within the meaning of Title II of the Social Security Act;

The state will pay to the secretary of the treasury, at times as prescribed under the Social Security Act, contributions with respect to wages equal to the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by sections 1400 and 1410 of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act if the services covered by the agreement constituted employment within the meaning of that act;

The agreement is effective with respect to services in employment performed after a date specified therein, or in any modification thereof;

All services which constitute employment and are performed in the employ of the state or any of its political subdivisions shall be covered by the agreement.

Any instrumentality jointly created by this state and any other state or states, upon the granting of like authority by the other state or states, may:

Enter into an agreement with the federal security administrator whereby the benefits of the federal old age and survivors’ insurance system shall be extended to employees of the instrumentality;

Require its employees to pay (and for that purpose to deduct from their wages) contributions equal to the amounts which they would be required to pay under W.S. 9-3-304(a) if they were covered by an agreement made pursuant to subsection (a) of this section; and

Make payments to the secretary of the treasury in accordance with the agreement, including payments from its own funds, and otherwise to comply with the agreement.

The agreement under subsection (b) of this section shall, to the extent practicable, be consistent with other provisions of this act [§§

9-3-301

through

9-3-306

].

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 122, § 3; 1953, ch. 43, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-287; W.S. 1977, §

9-5-104

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-3-301(a)(ix).

Social Security Act. —

The federal Social Security Act, referred to throughout subsection (a), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

Federal Insurance Contributions Acts. —

Sections 1400 and 1410 of the federal Insurance Contributions Act, referred to in subsection (a)(ii), were repealed by Act Aug. 16, 1954, ch. 736, 68A Stat. 919. For similar provisions, see 26 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eligibility for relief from federal employment taxes under § 530 of Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 3401 note), 149 ALR Fed 627.

§ 9-3-304.
Governmental employee's contributions; amount; collection by payroll deduction; adjustments; payments from political subdivisions.

Every employee of the state and political subdivision thereof, whose services are covered by an agreement entered into under W.S.

9-3-303

, shall be required to pay, for the period of coverage, into the account established by W.S.

9-3-305

, contributions, with respect to wages equal to the amount of tax which would be imposed by section 1400 of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act if the services constituted employment within the meaning of that act. The liabilities shall arise in consideration of the employee’s retention in the service of the state or political subdivision thereof, or his entry upon such service after the enactment of this act.

The contribution imposed by this section shall be collected through the office of the state treasurer by deducting the amount of the contribution from wages as and when paid. The deductions shall be made by the finance officer of the state, or political subdivision thereof, but failure to make the deduction shall not relieve the employee or the political subdivision as the employer of liability for the contribution.

If more or less than the correct amount of the contribution imposed by this section is paid or deducted with respect to any remuneration, proper adjustments, or refund if adjustment is impracticable, shall be made, without interest, in the manner and at the times as prescribed by the secretary of the treasury and state treasurer.

Each political subdivision shall pay contributions into the account with respect to wages at the times the state agency by regulation prescribes, in the amounts and at the rates specified in the applicable agreement entered into by the state agency under W.S.

9-3-303

.

Payments due from political subdivisions under subsections (b) and (d) of this section, which are delinquent may be recovered by the state with interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum in an action brought for that purpose in a court of competent jurisdiction against the political subdivision liable therefor.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 122, § 4; 1953, ch. 43, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-288; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

9-5-105

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “trust and agency fund” preceding “account”; and in (d), substituted “account” for “trust and agency fund.”

Federal Insurance Contributions Act. —

Section 1400 of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, referred to in subsection (a), was repealed by Act Aug. 16, 1954, Ch. 736, 68A stat. 919. For similar provisions, see 26 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-3-305.
Account; establishment; contents; account to be held separate; withdrawals; treasurer and custodian of account; appropriations to account.

A separate account is established which shall consist of and there shall be deposited in the account:

All contributions, interest and penalties collected under W.S.

9-3-304

;

All monies appropriated thereto under this act;

Any property or securities and earnings thereof acquired through the use of monies belonging to the account;

Interest earned upon any monies in the account; and

All sums recovered upon the bond of the custodian or otherwise for losses sustained by the account, and, all other monies received for the account from any other source. All monies in the account shall be mingled and undivided. Subject to the provisions of this act, the state treasurer is vested with full power, authority and jurisdiction over the account, including all monies and property or securities belonging thereto, and may perform any and all acts whether or not specifically designated, which are necessary to the administration thereof and are consistent with the provisions of this act.

The account shall be established and held separate and apart from any other funds or monies of the state and shall be used and administered exclusively for the purpose of this act. Withdrawals from the account shall be made for, and solely for:

Payment of amounts required to be paid to the secretary of the treasury pursuant to an agreement entered into under W.S. 9-3-303(b);

Payment of refunds provided for in W.S. 9-3-304(c); and

Refunds of overpayments, not otherwise adjustable, made by a political subdivision or instrumentality.

From the account the custodian of the account shall pay to the secretary of the treasury the amounts and at the times as may be directed by the state treasurer of the state of Wyoming, in accordance with an agreement entered into under W.S.

9-3-303

and the Social Security Act.

The state treasurer is the treasurer and custodian of the account and shall administer it in accordance with this act and shall pay all warrants drawn upon it in accordance with this section and with regulations prescribed pursuant to the agreement between the state, acting through its state treasurer, and the federal government [acting] through the social security department.

In addition to the contributions collected and paid into the account under W.S.

9-3-304

, to be available for the purpose of W.S. 9-3-305(b) and (c) until expended, additional sums may be appropriated annually to the account as necessary to make the payments to the secretary of the treasury for which the state of Wyoming is obligated pursuant to an agreement entered into under W.S.

9-3-303

. The funds necessary to support this account shall be included in the budget request presented at each legislative session.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 122, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-289; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

9-5-106

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “A separate account” for “An account within the trust and agency fund” and made stylistic changes in the introductory language in (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-3-301(a)(ix).

Social Security Act. —

The federal Social Security Act, referred to in subsection (c), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-3-306.
Duties of state treasurer; promulgation of rules and regulations.

The state treasurer shall promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this act as necessary or appropriate to the efficient administration of the functions with which he is charged under this act.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 122, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-290; W.S. 1977, §

9-5-107

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-3-301(a)(ix).

§ 9-3-307.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 31, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1951, ch. 122, § 7, related to the state treasurer's duty to report to the legislature regarding studies concerning old age and survivor's insurance protection.